Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.160

Council—Authority.

The council shall have all of the powers which inhere in the city or town not reserved to the people or vested in the city manager, including but not restricted to the authority to adopt ordinances and resolutions.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.160. Prior: (i) 1943 c 271 s 9, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-18, part. (ii) 1943 c 271 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-19, part.]